Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0832.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 8a. (1) A legislator shall not chair a legislative committee if an immediate family member of that legislator is the head of a principal department and chairing that committee would create a conflict of interest. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Immediate family member" means any of the following: (i) The individual's parent. (ii) The individual's sibling. (iii) The individual's child. (iv) The individual's spouse. (v) The individual's sister-in-law or brother-in-law. (b) "Legislator" means a member of the state house of representatives or state senate.